Hawaii, session 2025, HB1453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that public meetings should be conducted at times that are accessible to the general public.  The legislature further finds that public meetings conducted after 9:00 p.m. disadvantage those with work, school, or caregiving obligations the following day. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit boards from beginning or continuing meetings after 9:00 p.m., excluding county council meetings. SECTION 2.  Chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§92-     Meeting times; limitations.  No board shall begin or continue a meeting after 9:00 p.m.; provided that this section shall not apply to county council meetings." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________